New York, session 2025-2026, S2174.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1115 of the tax law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision (mm) to read as follows: 3 (mm) Receipts from the sale of heating fuels sold during the months of 4 December, January, and February, which are sold for home use by persons 5 sixty-five years old or older who do not qualify for the low income home 6 energy assistance program established by section ninety-seven of the 7 social services law, but whose income is not above five hundred dollars 8 more than the qualifying income for such program, shall be exempt from 9 the tax on retail sales imposed under section eleven hundred ten of this 10 article. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06118-01-5